Utah statutes.
19-5-105.5.   Agriculture water.

(1) (a)  The board shall draft any rules relating to agriculture water in cooperation with the commission.

(b)  The commission shall advise the board before the board may adopt rules relating to agriculture water.

(2)  A program or rule adopted by the board for agriculture production or irrigation water shall:

(a)  be consistent with the federal Clean Water Act; and

(b)  if possible, be developed in a voluntary cooperative program with the agriculture producer associations and the commission.

(3) (a)  The board's authority to regulate a discharge is subject to Subsection (3)(b) relating to an agriculture discharge.

(b) (i)  A person responsible for an agriculture discharge shall mitigate the resulting damage in a reasonable manner, as approved by the director after consulting with the commission chair.

(ii)  A penalty imposed on an agriculture discharge shall be proportionate to the seriousness of the resulting harm, as determined by the director in consultation with the commission chair.

(iii)  An agriculture producer may not be held liable for an agriculture discharge resulting from a large weather event if the agriculture producer has taken reasonable measures, as the board defines by rule, to prevent an agriculture discharge.



Amended by Chapter 360, 2012 General Session

